South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S941.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-28-2740(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) At least twenty-five percent of a county's apportionment of "C" funds, based on a biennial averaging of expenditures, must be expended on the state highway system for construction, improvements, and maintenance. The Department of Transportation shall administer all funds expended on the state highway system unless the department has given explicit authority to a county or municipal government or other agent acting on behalf of the county transportation committee to design, engineer, construct, and inspect projects using their own personnel. The county transportation committee, at its discretion, may expend up to seventy-five percent of "C" construction funds for activities including other local paving or improving county roads, for street and traffic signs, and for other road and bridge projectsReserved. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----